Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.060

Poison center medical director—Poison information specialist—Certification required.

(1) A person may not act as a poison center medical director or perform the duties of poison information specialists of a poison information center without being certified by the secretary under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if a poison center medical director terminates certification or is decertified, that poison center medical director's authority may be delegated by the department to any other person licensed to practice medicine and surgery under chapter 18.71 RCW or osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW for a period of thirty days, or until a new poison center medical director is certified, whichever comes first.

[ 1996 c 178 s 8; 1993 c 343 s 4; 1987 c 214 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.